New Jersey, session 222, A3056.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Approved program of study means an undergraduate program leading to a bachelor's degree offered by a four-year institution of higher education; a post-baccalaureate program; or a graduate program leading to a master's degree offered by an institution of higher education in the State. Authority means the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority. Certificate of eligibility with advanced standing means an instructional certificate with lifetime validity issued by the State Board of Examiners to candidates who meet degree, academic, and test requirements for teacher certification and complete an educator preparation program. Clinical practice means the culminating field-based experience or internship required by an educator preparation program. Eligible student means a student completing a required clinical practice through a certificate of eligibility with advanced standing educator preparation program at an institution of higher education. Program means the New Jersey Student Teacher Scholarship Program. 2.    a.  There is established in the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority, in coordination with the Department of Education, the New Jersey Student Teacher Scholarship Program. The purpose of the program shall be to reduce financial barriers to teacher certification. b.  Under the program, the authority shall award scholarships to eligible students for each semester of full-time clinical practice completed by a student in a school in the State. Students shall be awarded a scholarship in an amount not to exceed $7,200 for each semester of full-time clinical practice completed by a student.  The executive director of the authority may increase the maximum award amount established pursuant to this section to include a cost of living adjustment. A student shall be eligible to receive a scholarship under the program for a maximum of two academic semesters. 3.    a.  To be eligible for a scholarship under the program, an applicant shall: (1) be a resident of the State; (2) be enrolled on a full-time basis in an approved program of study; and (3) complete any steps required by the approved program of study to be eligible to apply for clinical practice. b.  The authority, in coordination with the department, may establish additional eligibility requirements and minimum qualifications for the program, including limiting the program to students seeking degrees in math, science, special education, world languages, bilingual education, or other subjects determined to be in high demand for educators by the department. c.  A students scholarship shall continue only during the period the student remains in good academic standing, as defined by the institution and continues to meet the eligibility and minimum qualifications established pursuant to subsections a. and b. of this section. d.  (1) The scholarship shall be terminated if a student is dismissed from the institution of higher education or educator preparation program for academic or disciplinary reasons, is disqualified from employment by a school district due to the detection of criminal history record information pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1986, c.116 (C.18A:6-7.1), or otherwise becomes ineligible to receive a certificate of eligibility with advanced standing from the Board of Examiners. (2) The scholarship shall be terminated if a student withdraws from an approved program of study due to the students illness, the illness of a member of the students immediate family, or a family emergency, but the student shall not be required to repay the amount of any scholarship received under the program. 4.    Within 90 days of the effective date of this act, the authority shall establish an application process to provide scholarships to eligible students under the New Jersey Student Teacher Scholarship Program established pursuant to section 2 of this act. No later than the first day of the fourth month next following the effective date of this act, the authority shall make the application available, and shall, within a reasonable time frame thereafter, commence approving applications for the program. 5.    The authority, in coordination with the Department of Education, shall annually collect data to measure the effectiveness of the program, which shall include, but not be limited to: a.     the total number of program participants, disaggregated by certificate of eligibility with advanced standing educator preparation program; b.    a survey of program participants to measure the participants experience with the program; and c.     the demographic data of each program participant, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender. 6.    Nothing in this act shall be construed to exempt a student from meeting educator certification requirements in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the State Board of Education. 7.    The Legislature shall annually appropriate from the General Fund to the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority amounts as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 8.  This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full academic year following the date of enactment.